Ohio, session 136, SB459.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 4517.02 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 4517.02. (A) Except as otherwise provided in this section, no person shall do any of the following: (1) Engage in the business of displaying or selling at retail new motor vehicles or assume to engage in that business, unless the person is licensed as a new motor vehicle dealer under sections 4517.01 to 4517.45 of the Revised Code, or is a salesperson employed by a licensed new motor vehicle dealer; (2) Engage in the business of offering for sale, displaying for sale, or selling at retail or wholesale used motor vehicles or assume to engage in that business, unless the person is licensed as a new motor vehicle dealer, used motor vehicle dealer, or motor vehicle leasing dealer under sections 4517.01 to 4517.45 of the Revised Code, is a salesperson employed by a licensed used motor vehicle dealer or licensed new motor vehicle dealer, or the person holds a construction equipment auction license issued under section 4517.17 of the Revised Code; (3) Engage in the business of regularly making available, offering to make available, or arranging for another person to use a motor vehicle, in the manner described in division (M) of section 4517.01 of the Revised Code, unless the person is licensed as a motor vehicle leasing dealer under sections 4517.01 to 4517.45 of the Revised Code; (4) Engage in the business of motor vehicle auctioning or assume to engage in that business, unless the person is licensed as a motor vehicle auction owner under sections 4517.01 to 4517.45 of the Revised Code and the person uses an auctioneer who is licensed under Chapter 4707. of the Revised Code to conduct the motor vehicle auctions or the person holds a construction equipment auction license issued under section 4517.17 of the Revised Code; (5) Engage in the business of distributing motor vehicles or assume to engage in that business, unless the person is licensed as a distributor under sections 4517.01 to 4517.45 of the Revised Code; (6) Make (6)(a) Except as provided in division (A)(6)(b) of this section, make more than five casual sales of motor vehicles in a twelve-month period, commencing with the day of the month in which the first such sale is made, nor provide a location or space for the sale of motor vehicles at a flea market, without obtaining a license as a dealer under sections 4517.01 to 4517.45 of the Revised Code, provided that nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the disposition without a license of a motor vehicle originally acquired and held for purposes other than sale, rental, or lease to an employee, retiree, officer, or director of the person making the disposition, to a corporation affiliated with the person making the disposition, or to a person licensed under sections 4517.01 to 4517.45 of the Revised Code; (b) Division (A)(6)(a) of this section does not apply to any charitable donation of a motor vehicle to a nonprofit organization. (7) Provide a location or space for the sale of motor vehicles at a flea market without obtaining a license as a dealer under sections 4517.01 to 4517.45 of the Revised Code; (8) Engage in the business of auctioning both large construction or transportation equipment and also motor vehicles incident thereto, unless the person is a construction equipment auctioneer or the person is licensed as a motor vehicle auction owner and the person uses an auctioneer who is licensed under Chapter 4707. of the Revised Code to conduct the auction; (8)(9) Engage in the business of displaying or selling at retail adaptive mobility vehicles or assume to engage in that business, unless the person is licensed as an adaptive mobility dealer under sections 4517.01 to 4517.45 of the Revised Code, or is a salesperson employed by a licensed adaptive mobility dealer, except that any licensed motor vehicle dealer may sell at retail a used adaptive mobility vehicle. (B) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require an auctioneer licensed under sections 4707.01 to 4707.19 of the Revised Code to obtain a motor vehicle auction owner's license under sections 4517.01 to 4517.45 of the Revised Code when engaged in auctioning for a licensed motor vehicle auction owner. The establishment of a construction equipment auction license by Am. Sub. H.B. 114 of the 129th general assembly shall not in any way modify, limit, or restrict in any manner the conduct of auctions by persons licensed under Chapter 4707. of the Revised Code who are acting in compliance with that chapter. (C) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the disposition without a license of a motor vehicle originally acquired and held for purposes other than sale, rental, or lease to an employee, retiree, officer, or director of the person making the disposition, to a corporation affiliated with the person making the disposition, or to a person licensed under sections 4517.01 to 4517.45 of the Revised Code. (D) Sections 4517.01 to 4517.45 of the Revised Code do not apply to any of the following: (1) Persons engaging in the business of selling commercial tractors, trailers, or semitrailers incidentally to engaging primarily in business other than the selling or leasing of motor vehicles; (2) Mortgagees selling at retail only those motor vehicles that have come into their possession by a default in the terms of a mortgage contract; (3) The leasing, rental, and interchange of motor vehicles used directly in the rendition of a public utility service by regulated motor carriers. (D)(E) When a partnership licensed under sections 4517.01 to 4517.45 of the Revised Code is dissolved by death, the surviving partners may operate under the license for a period of sixty days, and the heirs or representatives of deceased persons and receivers or trustees in bankruptcy appointed by any competent authority may operate under the license of the person succeeded in possession by that heir, representative, receiver, or trustee in bankruptcy. (E)(F) No remanufacturer shall engage in the business of selling at retail any new motor vehicle without having written authority from the manufacturer or distributor of the vehicle to sell new motor vehicles and to perform repairs under the terms of the manufacturer's or distributor's new motor vehicle warranty, unless, at the time of the sale of the vehicle, each customer is furnished with a binding agreement ensuring that the customer has the right to have the vehicle serviced or repaired by a new motor vehicle dealer who is franchised to sell and service vehicles of the same line-make as the chassis of the remanufactured vehicle purchased by the customer and whose service or repair facility is located within either twenty miles of the remanufacturer's location and place of business or twenty miles of the customer's residence or place of business. If there is no such new motor vehicle dealer located within twenty miles of the remanufacturer's location and place of business or the customer's residence or place of business, the binding agreement furnished to the customer may be with the new motor vehicle dealer who is franchised to sell and service vehicles of the same line-make as the chassis of the remanufactured vehicle purchased by the customer and whose service or repair facility is located nearest to the remanufacturer's location and place of business or the customer's residence or place of business. Additionally, at the time of sale of any vehicle, each customer of the remanufacturer shall be furnished with a warranty issued by the remanufacturer for a term of at least one year. (F)(G) No adaptive mobility dealer shall do any of the following: (1) Represent that the dealer is engaged in the business of selling new motor vehicles; (2) Sell, transfer, or offer to sell or transfer a new motor vehicle unless that new motor vehicle is purchased through a licensed new motor vehicle dealer; (3) Sell or offer to sell an adaptive mobility vehicle without written documentation proving that the vehicle was adapted or modified in accordance with 49 C.F.R. part 568 or 595. (G)(H) Except as otherwise provided in this division, whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor misdemeanor and shall be subject to a mandatory fine of one hundred dollars. If the offender previously has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to a violation of this section, whoever violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor of the first degree and shall be subject to a mandatory fine of one thousand dollars. (H)(I) The offenses established under this section are strict liability offenses and section 2901.20 of the Revised Code does not apply. The designation of these offenses as strict liability offenses shall not be construed to imply that any other offense, for which there is no specified degree of culpability, is not a strict liability offense. Section 2. That existing section 4517.02 of the Revised Code is hereby repealed.